Idaho statutes. Title 49 MOTOR VEHICLES
Chapter 11
CARAVANING OF MOTOR VEHICLES

Sec.

§ 49-1101 — 49-1136. Permit required — Display — Distance between cars in caravan — Fee for permit — Compliance with transportation laws — Driving under the influence of alcohol, drugs, etc. — Penalties — Aggravated offense — Permit nontransferable — Duration — Contents — Fee for permit in lieu of other fees — Exception — Administration of law. [Redesignated and Repealed.]